Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-777
Outpatient treatment, defined.

Outpatient treatment shall mean counseling and therapy provided on a nonresidential basis when such treatment is rendered in or through a hospital, a substance abuse treatment center, or an outpatient program which is certified or accredited to render such care.

Laws 1980, LB 646, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 20.